Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1195
Department of Health and Human Services;
cooperate with applicants and recipients.

The Department of Health and Human
Services shall cooperate with applicants and recipients under sections 79-1189
to 79-1193 pursuing funding under the state Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program Employment and Training plan established pursuant to the federal Food
and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq., as such act and sections
existed on January 1, 2012, the federal Temporary Assistance to Needy Families
program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq., as such sections existed on
January 1, 2012, and funding under the aid to dependent children program.

Laws 2012, LB1079, § 7.
June 30, 2015